Utah statutes.
41-22-3.5.   Staggered registration dates -- Registration renewal.

(1)  Unless exempted under Section 41-22-9, every off-highway vehicle registration, every registration card, and every registration sticker issued under this chapter for the first registration of the off-highway vehicle in this state, continues in effect for a period of 12 months beginning with the first day of the calendar month of registration and does not expire until the last day of the same month in the following year.

(2)  If the last day of the registration period falls on a day in which the appropriate state or county offices are not open for business, the registration of the off-highway vehicle is extended to 12 midnight of the next business day.

(3) (a)  The division may receive applications for registration renewal and issue new registration cards at any time prior to the expiration of the registration, subject to the availability of renewal materials.

(b)  Applications for registration renewal shall be made in accordance with Section 41-22-3.

(4) (a)  The new registration shall retain the same expiration month as recorded on the original registration even if the registration has expired.

(b)  The year of registration expiration shall be changed to reflect the renewed registration period.

(5)  If the registration renewal application is an application generated by the division through its automated system, the owner need not surrender the last registration card or duplicate.



Enacted by Chapter 317, 2003 General Session

